Utah statutes.
64-9b-4.   Work to be voluntary -- Payment of prevailing wages.

(1) Rehabilitative and job opportunities at the Utah state prison and participating county jails shall not be forced upon any inmate contrary to the Utah Constitution, Article XVI, Section 3 (2), but instead shall be on a completely voluntary basis.

(2) Private businesses that manufacture products for sale in Utah or in interstate commerce shall pay inmates the prevailing wage for similar work in local private industry.  Private businesses that provide services, agricultural products, or manufactured products for export shall pay inmates wages determined by the department, but should not displace local Utah workers as a result of their employment of inmates.



Amended by Chapter 158, 1997 General Session

